Utah statutes.
75-7-801.   Duty to administer trust.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust expeditiously and in good faith, in accordance with its terms and purposes and the interests of the beneficiaries, and in accordance with this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

